Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-101
Money; denominations; public payments.

The money of account of this state is the dollar, cent and mill, and all public accounts, and the proceedings of all courts in relation to money, shall be kept and expressed in money of the above denominations.

R.S.1866, c. 37, § 1, p. 269;

R.S.1913, § 4015;

C.S.1922, § 3418;

C.S.1929, § 58-101;

R.S.1943, § 58-101.